phonology/07_shewa.xfst
!
! 07_shewa.xfst - Shewa Rules
! Rule of shewa and related phenomena
!
! References: Joüon-Muraoka §10, GKC §11
!

!
! ============================================================
! RULE OF SHEWA
! Two vocal shewas cannot stand adjacent
! First becomes chireq (hiriq)
! ============================================================

define Shewa_Chireq
  0:i || Shewa _ Shewa .
  0:i || [ i | e ] _ .

!
! Shewa after shureq/holam
! ========================

define Shewa_After_Long_Vowel
  0:0 || [ o: | u: | i: ] _ Shewa .

!
! ============================================================
! SHEWA IN COMPOUND (Maqqef)
! After maqqef, first vowel reduces
! ============================================================

define Maqqef_Shewa
  Vowel -> 0 || [ = | - ] _ .

!
! ============================================================
! NO SHEWA AT WORD END
! Final shewa is silent
! ============================================================

define No_Final_Shewa
  0 -> 0 || _ # .

!
! ============================================================
! PRONUNCIATION OF SHEWA
! Vocal shewa = reduced /ə/
! Silent shewa = glottal stop before vowel
! ============================================================

define Vocal_Shewa
  ! Silent shewa before consonant
  0:ʔ || Vowel _ C .
  
  ! Vocal shewa before vowel
  0:ə || C _ Vowel .

!
! ============================================================
! B/K/L PREPOSITION + SHEWA
! Before shewa-initial word: becomes dagesh
! ============================================================

define BKL_Shewa_Dagesh
  [ b | k | l ]:0 -> [ b:k | k:k | l:l ] || _ Shewa .

!
! ============================================================
! COMPOSE SHEWA RULES
! ============================================================

define ShewaRules
  Shewa_Chireq
  .o.
  Shewa_After_Long_Vowel
  .o.
  Maqqef_Shewa
  .o.
  No_Final_Shewa
  .o.
  Vocal_Shewa
  .o.
  BKL_Shewa_Dagesh
;

regex ShewaRules;
